Utah statutes.
31A-37a-202.   Revocation, suspension, amendment, or modification of a certificate of authority.

Except as provided in Sections 31A-37a-501 and 31A-37a-502, the commissioner may not revoke, suspend, amend, or modify a certificate of authority issued to a special purpose financial captive insurance company under this chapter or an order issued under Subsection 31A-37a-201(4) unless:

(1)  the special purpose financial captive insurance company consents to the revocation, suspension, amendment, or modification; or

(2)  the commissioner shows by clear and convincing evidence that the revocation, suspension, amendment, or modification is necessary to avoid irreparable harm to:

(a)  a special purpose financial captive insurance company; or

(b)  a ceding insurer.



Enacted by Chapter 302, 2008 General Session

